Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-235.01
Open enrollment option student; continued attendance; attendance at another school building; application.

Each student attending a school building outside of the resident school district as an open enrollment student pursuant to section 79-2110 for any part of school year 2016-17 shall be automatically approved as an open enrollment option student beginning with school year 2017-18 and allowed to continue attending such school building as an option student without submitting an additional application unless the student has completed the grades offered in such school building or has been expelled and is disqualified pursuant to section 79-266.01. Except as provided in subsection (3) of section 79-2110 for students attending a focus school, focus program, or magnet school, approval as an open enrollment option student pursuant to this section does not permit the student to attend another school building within the option school district unless an application meeting the requirements prescribed in section 79-237 is approved by the school board of the option school district. Upon approval of an application meeting the requirements prescribed in section 79-237, a student previously enrolled as an open enrollment student in the option school district shall be treated as an option student of the option school district without regard to his or her former status as an open enrollment student. Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 79-234, 79-235, 79-237, and 79-238 and subsection (3) of section 79-2110, open enrollment option students shall be treated as option students of the option school district.

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 15.